Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2590HC (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 280.13C, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. The department of health and human services, the Iowa 3 high school athletic association, and the Iowa girls high 4 school athletic union shall work together to develop training 5 materials and courses regarding concussions and brain injuries, 6 including training regarding evaluation, prevention, symptoms, 7 risks, and long-term effects of concussions and brain injuries. 8 Each coach or contest official shall complete such training 9 at least every two years , and each coach shall complete such 10 training every two years . 11